Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2101.03
Tax; calculation.

(1) For decedents dying on or after January 1, 2003, and before July 1, 2003, the tax on the Nebraska taxable estate shall be the greater of the maximum state tax credit allowance upon the tax imposed under Chapter 11 of the Internal Revenue Code or the amount provided in the following table:

Nebraska taxable estate

Of Excess

At least
But less than
Tax =
+
%
Over

$0
$40,000
$0

0
$0

40,00090,0000.840,00090,000140,0004001.690,000140,000240,0001,2002.4140,000240,000440,0003,6003.2240,000440,000640,00010,0004440,000640,000840,000
18,0004.8640,000840,0001,040,00027,6005.6840,0001,040,0001,540,00038,8006.41,040,0001,540,0002,040,00070,8007.21,540,0002,040,0002,540,000106,80082,040,0002,540,0003,040,000146,8008.82,540,0003,040,0003,540,000190,8009.63,040,0003,540,0004,040,000238,80010.43,540,0004,040,0005,040,000290,80011.24,040,0005,040,0006,040,000402,800125,040,0006,040,0007,040,000522,80012.86,040,0007,040,0008,040,000650,80013.67,040,0008,040,0009,040,000786,80014.48,040,0009,040,00010,040,000930,80015.29,040,00010,040,0001,082,8001610,040,000

(2) For decedents dying on or after July 1, 2003, and before January 1, 2007, the tax on the Nebraska taxable estate shall be the greater of the maximum state tax credit allowance upon the tax imposed under Chapter 11 of the Internal Revenue Code or the amount provided in the following table:

Nebraska taxable estate

Of Excess

At least
But less than
Tax =
+
%
Over

$0
$100,000
$0

5.6
$0

100,000
500,000
5,6006.4100,000500,0001,000,00031,2007.2500,0001,000,0001,500,00067,20081,000,0001,500,0002,000,000107,2008.81,500,0002,000,0002,500,000151,2009.62,000,0002,500,0003,000,000199,20010.42,500,0003,000,0003,500,000251,20011.23,000,0003,500,0004,000,000307,200123,500,0004,000,0005,000,000367,20012.84,000,0005,000,0006,000,000495,20013.65,000,0006,000,0007,000,000631,20014.46,000,0007,000,0008,000,000775,20015.27,000,0008,000,0009,000,000927,200168,000,0009,000,0001,087,20016.89,000,000

(3) Taxable generation-skipping transfers shall be taxed at a rate of sixteen percent of the Nebraska taxable transfer.

Laws 2002, LB 905, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 283, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 759, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 1034, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB367, § 8.